Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of promoting the safety and protection
of students and emphasizing how students should respond when
encountering a firearm, the board of education of a school district may
provide firearm safety education programs. The state board of education
shall establish curriculum guidelines for a standardized firearm safety
education program. Such guidelines shall include, but not be limited to,
accident prevention and, for students enrolled in:
(1) Kindergarten and grades one through five, shall be the eddie eagle
gunsafe program offered by the national rifle association or any successor
program;
(2) grades six through eight, shall be the eddie eagle gunsafe program
offered by the national rifle association or any successor program or the
hunter education in our schools program offered by the Kansas department
of wildlife and parks or any successor program; and
(3) grades nine through 12, shall be the hunter education in our
schools program offered by the Kansas department of wildlife and parks or
any successor program.
(b) When a board of education elects to provide firearm safety
education, such instruction shall be in accordance with the guidelines
established by the state board of education and shall be offered to ensure
that all students are provided the opportunity to take the course.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.